Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.345

"Earnable compensation" defined for certain part-time employees—Adoption of rules.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Subject to the limitations contained in this section, for the purposes of *RCW 41.32.010(10)(a)(ii), earnable compensation means the compensation the member would have received in the same position if employed on a regular full-time basis for the same contract period.

(2) In order to ensure that the benefit provided by this section is not used to unfairly inflate a member's retirement allowance, the department shall adopt rules having the force of law to govern the application of this section.

(3)(a) In adopting rules which apply to a member employed by a school district, the department may consult the district's salary schedule and related workload provisions, if any, adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.405.200. The rules may require that, in order to be eligible for this benefit, a member's position must either be included on the district's schedule, or the position must have duties, responsibilities, and method of pay which are similar to those found on the district's schedule.

(b) In adopting rules which apply to a member employed by a community college district, the department may consult the district's salary schedule and workload provisions contained in an agreement negotiated pursuant to chapter 28B.52 RCW, or similar documents. The rules may require that, in order to be eligible for this benefit, a member's position must either be included on the district's agreement, or the position must have duties, responsibilities, and method of pay which are similar to those found on the district's agreement. The maximum full-time workweek used in calculating the benefit for community college employees paid on an hourly rate shall in no case exceed fifteen credit hours, twenty classroom contact hours, or thirty-five assigned hours.

(4) If the legislature amends or revokes the benefit provided by this section, no affected employee who thereafter retires is entitled to receive the benefit as a matter of contractual right.

[1992 c 212 s 18; 1990 c 33 s 570; 1987 c 265 s 2. Formerly RCW 41.32.011.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.32.010 was amended by 1994 c 298 s 3, changing subsection (10)(a)(ii) to subsection (10)(a)(iii). RCW 41.32.010 was subsequently amended by 2003 c 31 s 1, changing subsection (10)(a)(iii) to subsection (10)(a)(iv). RCW 41.32.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (10)(a)(iv) to subsection (14)(a)(iv).

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.